Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.130

Escape in the third degree.

(1) A person is guilty of escape in the third degree if he or she:

(a) Escapes from custody; or

(b) Knowingly violates the terms of an electronic monitoring program.

(2) Escape in the third degree is a misdemeanor, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3)(a) If the person has one prior conviction for escape in the third degree, escape in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(b) If the person has two or more prior convictions for escape in the third degree, escape in the third degree is a class C felony.

[ 2015 c 287 s 11; 2011 c 336 s 403; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.130.]

NOTES:

Term of escaped prisoner recaptured: RCW 9.31.090.